Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,134
Insurer; reports; disclosure restricted; confidentiality.

To the extent that reports made under section 38-1,129 or 38-1,130 contain or relate to privileged communications between consumer and credential holder, such reports shall be treated by the department as privileged communications and shall be considered to be part of the investigational records of the department. Such reports may not be obtained by legal discovery proceedings or otherwise disclosed unless the privilege is waived by the consumer involved or the reports are made part of the record in a contested case under section 38-186, in which case such reports shall only be disclosed to the extent they are made a part of such record. The identity of any person making such report or providing information leading to the making of such report shall be confidential.

Laws 1982, LB 421, § 5;

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 31;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 22;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,202;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 134;

Laws 2016, LB750, § 9.